Nevada, session 83, SB442.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 704.1835 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
704.1835 1. For the purposes of protecting the health of
residential customers who receive gas, water or electricity from
public utilities, the Commission shall adopt or amend regulations
that:
(a) Establish the criteria that will be used to determine when a
public utility is required to postpone its termination of utility service
to the residence of a residential customer who has failed to pay for
such service. Such criteria may be based in part upon the residential
customer’s ability to pay.
(b) Require a public utility to postpone its termination of utility
service to the residence of a residential customer who has failed to
pay for such service if the residential customer satisfies the criteria
established by the Commission and termination of the utility service
is reasonably likely to threaten the health of an occupant of the
residence of the residential customer.
2. In addition to the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection
1, for the purposes of regulating public utilities that provide gas,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
water or electricity to landlords who pay for the utility service and
who distribute or resell the gas, water or electricity to one or more
residential tenants, the Commission shall adopt or amend
regulations to require a public utility to use its best efforts to post, in
a conspicuous location, notice of the intent of the public utility to
terminate utility service because the landlord has failed to pay for
such service. Such notice must provide sufficient information to
allow residential tenants or their occupants to contact the public
utility if termination of the utility service is reasonably likely to
threaten the health of an occupant of the residence of a residential
tenant.
3. The Commission shall adopt regulations that require a
public utility, on or before the last day of the first month of each
calendar quarter, to make available to the public a report that
includes:
(a) The total number of monthly terminations of utility service
to the residences of residential customers during the previous
quarter; and
(b) Aggregated information concerning the residential
customers described in paragraph (a), which must include the zip
code of such residences.
4. A public utility shall not terminate utility service for gas,
water or electricity without complying with the regulations adopted
by the Commission pursuant to this section.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Gas” includes, without limitation, liquefied petroleum gas
and natural gas.
(b) “Landlord” means a landlord who is subject, in whole or in
part, to the provisions of chapter 118A or 118B of NRS.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)